Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7986.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 30-2 of the General Laws entitled "Organization and Command of
Military and Naval Forces" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
30-2-10.1. Official declaration of war required to deploy.
Notwithstanding any other provision of the general laws, the Rhode Island National Guard
and any member thereof shall not be released from the state into active duty combat unless the
United States Congress has passed an official declaration of war pursuant to Article 1, Section 8,
Clause 11 of the United States Constitution or has taken an official action pursuant to Article 1,
Section 8, Clause 15 of the United States Constitution to explicitly call forth the Rhode Island
National Guard and any member thereof for the enumerated purposes to expressly execute the laws
of the union, repel an invasion or suppress an insurrection. The governor shall take all actions
necessary to comply with the requirements of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004305
========